Massachusetts, session 194th, H2974.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
I. Protection from Forced Vaccination. -
Every person has the natural, essential, and inherent right to bodily integrity, free from
any threat or compulsion by government to accept an immunization. Accordingly, no person
may be compelled to receive an immunization for COVID-19 in order to secure, receive, or
access any public facility, any public benefit, or any public service from the Commonwealth of
Massachusetts, or any political subdivision thereof, including but not limited to counties, cities,
towns, precincts, water districts, school districts, school administrative units, or quasi-public
entities.
of 2

No person may be terminated from a position of employment at the Commonwealth of
Massachusetts or any political subdivision thereof, including but not limited to counties, cities,
towns, precincts, water districts, school districts, school administrative units, or quasi-public
entities due to not receiving the COVID-19 Vaccination.
II. Prohibition Against Public Agencies Issuing or Establishing COVID-19 Vaccine
Passports. –
Notwithstanding any other provision of State or federal law, State or federal rule,
executive order, local ordinance, or State or local declaration of emergency, no officer or
employee of the State or any political subdivision of the State may issue or establish any
standardized documentation, including something styled as a vaccine passport or vaccine pass,
for the purpose of verifying an individual's COVID-19 vaccination status to a third party, or
otherwise publish or share any individual's COVID-19 vaccination record.
Nothing in this section shall prohibit an individual who has received a COVID-19
vaccination from receiving from the person who administered the vaccine a COVID-19
Vaccination Record Card from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention indicating the
person received a COVID-19 vaccination.
III. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2